Missouri, session 2026, SB1743.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 389, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 389.1220, to read as
follows:
389.1220. 1. For purposes of this section,
"personally identifying information" includes a crew
member's or engineer's name, home address, personal
telephone number, driver's license number, Social Security
number, or other information that could reasonably be used
to identify or locate such individual.
2. Personally identifying information of train crew
members and engineers contained in reports or communications
related to railroad incidents involving motor vehicles shall
be redacted from any publicly released records.
3. Unredacted copies of such records shall be
accessible only:
(1) To the employing railroad or its authorized
representatives;
(2) By court order, and to others specifically
authorized by such order; or

SB 1743 2
(3) To law enforcement agencies, the attorney
general's office, or the department of transportation if the
information is necessary to perform their official duties.
4. If a court determines that a crew member or
engineer was not at fault in a railroad incident involving a
motor vehicle, such person's identifying information shall
remain confidential in all public records.
5. The department of transportation shall enforce this
section and may promulgate rules to ensure compliance and
confidentiality. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓